Utah statutes.
73-5a-205.   Approvals void after one year if construction delayed -- Exceptions.

(1)  Any approval granted under Section 73-5a-203 is void one year after the date of approval if construction has not started.

(2)  The state engineer may extend the approval in one year increments:

(a)  upon a showing of reasonable cause for delay; and

(b)  provided state-of-the-art design criteria has not changed in the intervening period.

